District of Columbia statutes.
1-620.04

Authority of Mayor.

(a)

The Mayor shall issue rules and regulations consistent with this subchapter and such laws of the federal government and the District of Columbia as they may, from time to time, be amended for the establishment, operation and administration of the District government’s occupational safety and health management program. Programs and procedures developed under the authority of this subchapter are appropriate matters for collective bargaining with labor organizations.

(b)

The Mayor shall ensure, through audits and inspections, compliance with this subchapter and the rules and regulations issued pursuant thereto, and shall direct that appropriate remedial or corrective action be taken when it is determined that noncompliance has occurred.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2004, 25 DCR 5740
1981 Ed., § 1-621.4.
1973 Ed., § 1-350.4.